 "He added, 'There are mice that are cured of diabetes now, which is four months old.'"
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical Science Section, warned that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the treatment of diabetes, and these results suggest that it is not relevant to patients with type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy Nobel Prize in Literature Secretary General Sara Danius publicly announced that the Academy had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan to inform him of the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, as it was impossible to deliver the news to him directly.
 "Right now we're not doing anything. I called his closest collaborator and emailed him, and he was very kind and said that's enough for now."
 Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said he started the company when he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage.
 He said he made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said in 2013 that sales increased after the show's contestants rejected the startup's funding on an episode of Shark Tank.
 In late 2017, Shimovolos appeared on the shopping television channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with competitor ADT.
 While one experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality, no drug has yet been clearly proven to treat existing infections.
 ZMapp, which showed promise early on, has been found in formal studies to have a smaller effect than expected in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics supports the USOC letter and recognizes the absolute necessity of having Olympic officials to help ensure a safe environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that by seeking meaningful change from within, rather than through withdrawal, we can bring about better results for athletes, teams and the sport.
 The U.S. gymnastics team supports an independent investigation into how the facts that Larry Nassar's victims have so bravely spoken about were not revealed for so long and how necessary and appropriate steps can be taken to ensure that this never happens again.
 The U.S. gymnastics team and the USOC have the same goal: to make the sport as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and supportive environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Breszinski served as an adviser to Kennedy and then worked in the Lyndon Johnson administration.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 campaign and then served as national security adviser to President Ronald Reagan from 1981 to 1985.
 As NSA, he advised President Carter on diplomatic issues such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iran hostage crisis that followed the Iranian Revolution in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 Starring Emma Stone and Ryan Gosling, the film was nominated for all the major categories.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other categories include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing, and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Dreams of Flying" and "City of Stars," were nominated for Best Original Song. The Lionsgate studio received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 U.S. President Donald Trump announced in a statement released through his spokesman late Sunday that U.S. troops would be withdrawn from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey also said it would protect captured ISIS fighters who have been extradited to the country from European nations.
 This not only confirms the widely accepted theory that some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides details that are usually lacking in fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists have revealed that the top of the feathers were purple and the underside was white or yellow.
 Such discoveries also provide insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Dinosaur feathers lack the well-developed quill called a quill, but have other distinctive feather features, such as barbs and small vanes, and researchers have speculated that these other features later evolved into quills.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but for thermoregulation or display. Researchers examined samples from the tail of a young dinosaur and found that the feathers were not juvenile, but adult.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but the sample shows that the feathers are not juvenile, but adult, the researchers say.
 Two police officers were killed and more than 20 others were injured in a car bomb blast at a police station in the Turkish city of Gaziantep yesterday morning.
 The governor said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they are investigating the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant (ISIL) militant group as responsible for the attack.
 They found that the sun works in the same way as other stars, by emitting light and by rotating.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation is used to determine the star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in the magnetic field.
 During the journey, Iwasaki encountered many obstacles.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a mad dog in Tibet, nearly married in Nepal and arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates in both the 2.4GHz and 5.0GHz frequency bands.
 If the base station has dual radios, this is 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, which allows for backward compatibility.
 802.11n theoretically has a bandwidth of up to 600 Mbit/s, which is considerably faster than the previous standards.
 Duvall, a married man with two adult children involved in the story, did not make a deep impression on Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, "I didn't hear a lot of what he said during the hearing... I was preparing, so I didn't hear what he said."
 "By 2020, we will make a significant reduction in the per capita carbon dioxide emissions from the 2005 level," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure, saying the scale of the cuts would be based on China's economic output.
 "Hu urged developing countries to "break the old habit of polluting first and cleaning up later."
 "Hu said, 'This does not mean that we should ask them to bear responsibilities that go beyond their stage of development and their capacity.'"
 The Iraqi Study Group released its report at 12 noon GMT (Greenwich Time) today.
 At this point, there is no guarantee that Iraq's actions will prevent an increase in sectarian warfare or violence, or chaos.
 The report begins with a plea for open debate and consensus-building on U.S. policy in the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the administration's current Iraq policy and calls for an immediate course correction.
 First, one of the 78 recommendations is that the United States should adopt a new foreign policy by the end of this year to secure its borders and reestablish diplomatic relations with neighboring countries in preparation for hostile Iraqi intervention.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, the current senator and wife of Argentina's president, announced her candidacy for the presidency in La Plata, 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires, last night.
 Kirchner announced her presidential candidacy at the same venue, the Teatro Colon, where she began her senatorial campaign in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 After Hurricane Katrina, spending on relief and reconstruction, and the conservative approach to the national budget, led to a controversy over what became known as Bush's New Orleans deal.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on what insiders in Washington called the reconstruction-related contracts.
 More than 4 million people gathered in Rome for the funeral.
 The number of people who attended was so large that most of them could not get into the funeral service in St. Peter's Square.
 Large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome to allow people to watch the funeral.
 Many cities in Italy and other cities around the world, especially in Poland, have set up similar screens so that many people can watch.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy cases, such as stolen vehicles, in order to artificially boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress has allocated funds for anti-pornography efforts since the 2005 budget, and the FBI has mandated that it must have 10 agents dedicated to the adult pornography field.
 Robin Uthappa scored the innings best with 41 runs off 41 balls with 6 sixes and 11 fours.
 Middle-order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid were in fine form and put on a 100-run partnership.
 However, after losing the wicket, India lost seven wickets to end the innings with 36 runs.
 President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was greeted by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush, after a week of defeats in the midterm elections, announced a trade expansion policy in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed Tuesday to give all caucus members a chance to review the government's "Clean Air Act" before it is read a second time in the House of Commons.
 "Layton, in a meeting with the prime minister, asked for the Conservative Party's environmental legislation to be "radically, completely rewritten," and called for changes to the Conservative Party's environmental legislation."
 When the federal government stepped in to take over funding for Mercy Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state governments and some federal MPs accused the move of being part of the federal election campaign in November.
 However, John Howard said the move was to prevent the hospital facilities from being downgraded by the state government, and he committed an extra $45 million.
 Recent reports have revealed that sea level readings were taken at the time of the tsunami, and that in fact a tsunami did hit near Niue and Fakaofo.
 No major damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the power supply was temporarily cut off, and the Tongan authorities were not able to receive the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools on or near the coastline were closed last Wednesday, despite the fact that the alert was canceled.
 U.S. President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndro said of the North's pledge, "It's a major step toward achieving the denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 The 10th hurricane of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed today in the Atlantic.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Tropical Storm Jerry is no longer a threat.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain per hour could breach the levee.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded to a height of 20 feet by Hurricane Katrina, is now being inundated by nearby levees.
 The water flows over a 100-foot-wide dam.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletions in a conversation with Wikinews last month.
 "He lied to us from the beginning, first saying it was all because of legal reasons, then acting like he was listening to us until the very end."
 Recent community backlash has led to efforts to create a policy proposal for the Wikimedia Sites containing sexually explicit content.
 Although mostly theoretical, the program is designed to simulate observations of the Pisces Galaxy Cluster.
 The effect the team was looking for could have been caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and the dark matter in the halo.
 Just as the moon exerts a force on Earth that causes tides, the Milky Way exerts a force on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around galaxies is located in a halo around the galaxy, and is made up of a large number of small particles.
 TV reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities have warned residents near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to Japanese government agencies, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that a container holding the uranium fuel at the site has ruptured and is leaking.
 Dr. Tony Moll discovered XDR-TB (extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis) in the KwaZulu-Natal region of South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is "very high mortality, very difficult to handle and scary."
 Dr. Moll believes some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of them were healthy hospital workers.
 In one year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the proportion of XDR-TB among all TB patients does not seem to be very high. At any given time, there are 330,000 TB patients in South Africa, and about 6,000 of them have XDR-TB.
 Weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, the two satellites collided 491 miles above the Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion from the collision was huge.
 They are still studying the size of the collision and what effects it will have on the Earth.
 The U.S. Defense Department's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the analysis will be published on the public website.
 The mother of a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh was found dead in the trunk of his car on Wednesday, and authorities in Ohio said they will charge him with aggravated murder.
 Dr. Malaras Balasubramaniam, 29, was found lying on the ground beside a road in the suburb of Blue Ash, Ohio, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, wearing only a T-shirt and underwear and under the influence of drugs.
 She pointed to her black Oldsmobile Intri-G, 150 meters away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramanian, covered with blood-stained sheets.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of the season were reported in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then by mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak has prompted the Indian government to dispatch pig catchers to the affected areas, distribute thousands of mosquito nets and spray insecticides.
 The delivery of millions of doses of the vaccine, as promised by the government, will be a big help in the preparations of health agencies next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the hardest-hit areas of the world this year have been delayed by funding shortfalls and lower priorities compared to other diseases.
 Slaney moved to Sweden in 1956, and three years later he began working for the Swedish Post Office, where he became chief sculptor.
 He has produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 "His work is highly regarded for its quality and detail, and he is one of the few "names" in the stamp business. There are even collectors who specialize in his work alone."
 His 1,000th stamp was a 2000 issue depicting the monumental work of David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, Sweden's greatest royal portraitist, and is listed in the Guinness Book of World Records.
 He has also been involved in the design of banknotes for other countries, most recently the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes, which feature his portrait on the front.
 After the incident, Gibson was taken to the hospital but died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the crash.
 The vehicle was moved from the crash site to Greenwich Mean Time on the same day at approximately 12:00.
 "One man working at a nearby garage said, 'The kids who were waiting to cross the street were all screaming and crying.'"
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also expects to complete the fundraising for a fund to help countries affected by global warming.
 That money could go to flood-resistant housing, water management improvements, and crop diversity.
 Fluke wrote that some efforts to silence women's voices on women's health have backfired.
 She said she reached this conclusion because of the overwhelmingly positive feedback from women and men who urged that contraception should be considered a medical necessity.
 As the wounded were taken to hospitals and the fighting stopped, about 40 inmates barricaded themselves in the prison yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to straighten things out, but the prisoners' demands were not clear.
 Between 10 and 11 p.m. MDT (Mountain Daylight Time), prisoners started fires in the prison yard.
 Soon, police equipped with riot gear entered the yard and used tear gas to corner the inmates.
 Firefighters finally extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal flooding that deposited sediment throughout the river was eliminated.
 These deposits are essential to creating the sandbars and beaches that are used as wildlife habitats.
 As a result, two species of fish became extinct, and two others, including the humpbacked chub, are endangered.
 The flood will raise the water level by a few feet, but officials are hoping that the eroded sandbars downstream will be restored.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Geophysics Institute in Jakarta, a quake of magnitude 6.5 or less would not trigger a tsunami warning.
 Despite the lack of tsunami danger, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey was in tears at the farewell, she promised her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not a farewell. This is a beginning of a new chapter."
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections show incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba winning a landslide victory.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also retained a majority in the parliamentary election.
 The coalition and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it, and other coalition aircraft were also sent to provide support.
 The collision occurred at a high altitude in mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rugged terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization (WHO) say the outbreak is the worst ever recorded in the country.
 "Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Veerman said: "Angola is in the worst situation and the situation in Angola is still very bad."
 The game started at 10am in good weather, and apart from a light drizzle in the morning, it was perfect for a seven-nation rugby tournament.
 Hosts South Africa, top seeds in the tournament, made a comfortable start with a 26-00 win over fifth seeds Zambia.
 In the matches against the southern nations, South Africa was completely outclassed, but as the tournament progressed, they improved steadily.
 Well-trained defensive skills, ball handling skills and great teamwork made them stand out and it was obvious to anyone that the team would win.
 Amsterdam city officials and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with fungus and is in danger of falling, posing a public health risk.
 It was scheduled to be torn down on Tuesday, but a court order prevented it.
 "All the caves with the name 'Seven Sisters' have entrances that are at least 100 to 250 metres (328 to 820 feet) in diameter."
 Infrared images show that the cave is likely due to temperature variations between night and day.
 "They are cooler during the day and warmer at night than the surrounding surface."
 "These thermal behaviors are not as stable as the large caverns on Earth that maintain a constant temperature, but they match the deep holes on the surface," said Glen Cushing, a member of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff.
 Voting in France is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters are isolated in booths, and they put their pre-printed paper ballots into envelopes that represent their candidates.
 After the staff members verify the voter's identity, the voter places the ballot in the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French electoral law, on the other hand, is rigidly codified.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has been made transparent so that voters and supervisors can see that there are no other envelopes in the ballot box other than the one containing the legally counted and certified ballot of the registered voter at the time of the start of the vote.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe the entire election process. In the evening, volunteers, under strict supervision, count the votes according to a specific procedure.
 Previously launched worldwide for cost-cutting and functionality, the ASUS Eee PC became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month in 2007.
 However, since ASUS received the Taiwan Sustainability Award from Taiwan's Executive Yuan Minister in 2007, the consumer market for notebook computers will be rapidly diversified and changed.
 The station's website describes the show as "a fresh, bold and reckless bunch of traditional radio theatre."
 Initially, the show was aired exclusively on TogiNet Radio, a site focused on torrent radio and long-term Internet radio.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary broadcasting station.
 The show originally featured local East Texans as the amateur announcers.
 With law enforcement officers not appearing in the city of Bishkek, widespread looting continued overnight, it was reported.
 "One eyewitness described the city of Bishkek as 'falling into anarchy' as people roamed the streets in groups and looted shops."
 Some residents of Bishkek have condemned the illegal actions of the southern protesters.
 South Africa won the Rugby Union Tri Nations match against the All Blacks (New Zealand) at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in South Africa.
 The final score was 21-20, and the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak was ended.
 The Springboks have won five games in a row.
 It was the final of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The final match of the series will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play Australia.
 The storm hit western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 The US Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Center reported no immediate damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 A dead wild duck infected with the deadly avian flu virus H5N1 has been found in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France, the first time the virus has been detected in a wild bird in France.
 France is the seventh country in Europe to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases suspected of being H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers has accused God of "millions of deaths, destruction and millions of terrorist acts" inflicted on the earth's population.
 "The atheist Chambers claimed that his lawsuit was 'trivial' and that 'anyone could sue anyone else.'"
 "The story that Camille Saint-Saens presented in French opera is the story of an artist who lived 'ruled by love of drugs and Japan.'"
 As a result, performers on stage are smoking marijuana cigarettes and encouraging the audience to participate in the theater itself.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann were in fourth, fifth and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but he was harsher in his words for Romney, who had run negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry said he would "go back to Texas tonight to evaluate the results of the leadership conference and determine if there is a path forward for me to be successful in this election," but later said he would stay in the race and compete in the Jan. 21 South Carolina primary.
 After winning the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann announced that she would be suspending her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, but later died there.
 "According to what I know, he is in his 20s. In a statement, Beaver said, "Although I was not at the scene of the tragic event and have no direct connection to it, I offer my condolences and prayers to the families of the victims."
 The entertainment news website TMZ acknowledged that the photographer had parked his car across the street from the Sepuveda Boulevard police station and had tried to take pictures of the police station before crossing the street, and that the California Highway Patrol had twice ordered him to back off.
 Police say the driver of the car that hit the photographer is unlikely to face criminal charges.
 Since only 18 medals are awarded per day, many countries have not won a medal on the podium.
 Yesterday's Super-G included the 9th place of Anna Jochemsen of the Netherlands in the women's standing class, and the 10th place of Katja Saarinen of Finland in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Gollan placed 11th in the men's standing super-G, while Czech competitor Oldrich Jelinek placed 16th in the men's sitting super-G.
 Mexican skater Ali Belskis finished 15th in men's super-combined, while New Zealand skier Adam Hall finished 9th in men's super-combined.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super G. South Korea's Park Jong-seok finished 24th in the men's Super G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are being blamed for the spread of disease that started near their base camp.
 According to the lawsuit, the UN camp failed to properly sanitize waste, allowing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the army came, Haiti had not had a health problem since 1800.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti cited independent research that the UN peacekeepers in Nepal inadvertently spread the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantianu, a UN health expert, said the sudden increase was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Mr. Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital had admitted a stable patient.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where the Ebola virus outbreak has occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in a variety of jobs on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening with the creation of The Simpsons, and hired the show's first writing staff.
 He left the pro circuit in 1993, but he kept the title of executive producer and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties every season.
 Earlier, China's Xinhua news agency reported that the plane was hijacked.
 According to subsequent reports, the plane was returning to Kandahar after receiving a bomb threat.
 According to early reports, the plane was sent back to Afghanistan after refusing to land at Jarmak.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, both civilian and military, because of the country's aging fleet of aircraft that are not well maintained.
 International sanctions meant that new aircraft purchases were out of the question.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three and injuring three others.
 Last month, an airplane bound for Armenia crashed in Iran, killing 168 people in the worst aviation accident in years.
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed off the runway at Mashad Airport, killing 17 people.
 Airbus has canceled the remaining concerts of the tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After lead singer Steven Tyler fell off the stage during a performance on August 5, the tour was canceled.
 Murray lost the first set after the two men traded service breaks.
 Del Potro got the first advantage in the second set, but after 6-6 he needed a tie-break again.
 Portis was treated for the injury at the time, but was able to return to the game.
 The program started at 8:30 p.m. local time (15.00 UTC).
 Renowned singers from across the country sang the religious hymn, Bajao, in front of Shri Shyam's feet.
 Singer Sanju Sharma broke the evening's silence and was followed by Jai Shankar Chowdhury. Chhappan Bhog was also performed. Singer Raju Khandelwal was there with him.
 And, Laka Sing led the way in singing the Bajan songs.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (56 different foods, fruits, nuts, and dishes offered to God) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Laka Sing also performed Chupan Bhog Bajan, sung by the singer Raju Kandelwal.
 In a keynote presentation at the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution game console.
 The controller, which resembles a television remote control, uses two sensors located near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This allows players to move the device through the air and control its movements.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car early on and had to retire.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was leading most of the race, but had a bad front wheel spin and had to retire shortly after.
 Michael Schumacher was just a few seconds behind Alonso at the finish line, but he was penalized for suspension damage caused by numerous collisions during the race.
 "According to the transcript of the press conference, Jiang said, 'She is very cute and sings quite well.'"
 "I was deeply moved every time I rehearsed this work."
 About three minutes after launch, a very large quantity of insulation foam was observed falling away from the fuel tank on the onboard camera.
 However, they are not thought to have caused the damage to the space shuttle.
 "NASA's space shuttle program manager, N. Wayne Hale Jr., said the foam insulation fell off during "what we were worried about" time.
 About five minutes after the fireworks started, the wind started to pick up. Then, about a minute later, the wind was blowing at 70 km/h. Then it started to rain, but it was so hard that it felt like needles. Then it started to hail. People were screaming and running around. It was crazy.
 "I lost my brother and his friend, and on the way I saw two disabled people in a wheelchair and people pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that Kashiwazaki Kariwa Nuclear Power Plant in Niigata Prefecture is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Company reported that there was no impact from the earthquake and that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 The 9,400 households in the area are said to live without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and train services were suspended in the affected areas, while Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport was closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Three more bombs exploded near the government building two hours later.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and up to 30 people were injured, but the final death toll is not yet known.
 After ingesting contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found in the urine samples of the deceased pets.
 The researchers said the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the function of the kidneys.
 The researchers observed that the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid caused crystals to form in the cat's urine.
 The composition of these crystals is consistent with the crystals found in the urine of affected animals when compared to infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 You may not know, but most of the goods from Central America enter the country duty-free.
 Even though twenty percent of our goods are taxed through customs in Central American countries, we treat you.
 That just didn't seem right to me. It certainly wasn't fair.
 My point is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 California Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that bans the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 "The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a "18" rating and imposes a $1,000 fine for selling the game to minors."
 Attorney General, QC, Keir Starmer, announced this morning that he will be prosecuting both Huhne and Pryce.
 Hoon resigned and will be replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey, the MP. Norman Lamb, the MP, is budgeted to take over the business department portfolio that Davey is leaving.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Olland (25) and Zachary Cudback (21), who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arms and jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider was badly injured in the face, requiring reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon missed the fifth man's head, but Schneider suffered persistent pain, lost an eye, had part of his skull removed and had his face reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home at the USAF base.
 Carpanedo competed in two individual races at the championships, in addition to the Wednesday event.
 Her first race was a slalom, where she didn't make it past the first gate. 36 of the 116 racers had the same result in that race.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she was 10th in a combined time of 4 minutes 41.30 seconds, 2 minutes 11.60 seconds behind the winner, Austria's Claudia Riegler, and 1 minute 9.20 seconds behind Hungary's Gundi Daniel.
 Four female skiers who were in the women's section did not make it to the finish line, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the race were eliminated.
 Madia Pradechi police recovered the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 "D K Arya Deputy Commissioner of Police said, "We have arrested five persons who raped a Swiss woman and also recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the suspects are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandrashekar Solanki, the police superintendent, said the accused came to court with his face covered.
 Three people were in the car when it crashed into the house, but none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the crash occurred was temporarily closed, and emergency crews rescued the driver from the red Audi TT.
 At first he was admitted to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is charged with murdering his son in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is awaiting trial and sentencing, but because of her notoriety, witness testimony may be biased.
 This is common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scottish law is different and the court saw the publication of the photographs as potentially harmful.
 Dundee University professor Pamela Ferguson said: "If journalists publish pictures of suspects, they are walking a tightrope.
 The Crown Office, which handles prosecutions, has told reporters there will be no further comment until the trial.
 According to the leaked documents, the paper would be based on the 1967 borders before the Middle East war and would address the border dispute that Palestinians want.
 According to reports, other topics include the future of the holy city of Jerusalem for both countries and the Jordan Valley issue.
 Israel demanded that the current troops in the zone be kept for 10 years, and the PA agreed that the troops would leave after five years.
 Hunters involved in the additional pest control trials were closely supervised by forestry officers because they were monitoring and assessing the effectiveness of the trials.
 The partnership between NPWS and the Australian Sports Shooter Association saw the recruitment of qualified volunteers to the Sports Shooter Association’s hunting program.
 According to Mike O'Flynn, acting Conservation and Heritage Manager for the NPWS, the four shooters selected for the first operation were all given comprehensive safety and training briefings.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday for a nine-member provisional electoral council (CEP).
 Matelli is the fifth CEP in four years.
 Last month, the presidential council recommended the resignation of the former CEP as part of measures to prepare for new elections.
 In response to the widespread anti-government protests that began in October, a commission was set up by Martelly.
 Some violent resistance movements were sparked by the fact that some elections were not held since 2011.
 About 60 incidents of iPod overheating have been reported, resulting in six fires and four minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 incidents involving the devices.
 Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported an additional 34 cases of overheating.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was "deeply regrettable" that Apple had postponed the release of the report.
 The quake hit the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT on Friday).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Agency said no damage was reported nationwide.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a bus in the Philippine capital Manila and took tourists from Hong Kong hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza fired an M-16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and at least six were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early, along with the Filipino photographers.
 Later, when an elderly woman needed to use the bathroom, the photographers took her place. Menendez was shot.
 Riggs followed in his father's footsteps and went into medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Working in a hospital, Donghan Riggs began to investigate early labor in his spare time.
 His research showed that when hormones were administered, the rate of lung maturation in the fetus was accelerated.
 Xinhua News Agency reported that government investigators recovered two flight data recorders, known as black boxes, on Wednesday.
 Other wrestling colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tami Drayer said, "Luna was the 1st Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. Luna left the world on a night with two full moons. Just like her, I am very special. She was a strong woman."
 "Dustin 'Goldie' Runnells said, 'Luna was as unique as I am... maybe even more unique... I love her and I'm going to miss her... I hope she's in a better place.'"
 A 2010 poll of 1,400 people conducted in the lead-up to the federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 Julia Gillard, during the 2010 federal election campaign, argued that Australia should become a republic when Queen Elizabeth II's reign ends.
 In a poll, 34 percent said they would like Elizabeth II to be Australia's last monarch.
 In a poll, 29 percent of respondents said Australia should become a republic quickly, while 31 percent said it should not.
 The Olympic gold medalist was scheduled to compete in the 100m and 200m freestyle and the Commonwealth Games relay, but his fitness was in doubt due to illness.
 The medications needed to overcome the pain were banned in the competition, so I couldn't take them.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at Central Missouri State University, has discovered the largest known prime number as of January 25.
 Several people have been using various hardware and software to prove the discovery since early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have delivered water to Earth along with organic material that makes up proteins and sustains life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the Earth formed, because a comet collided with it long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 "He called the rumors 'political nonsense and nonsense.'"
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that will allow aircraft to fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 This is in contrast to the use of ground-based radar technology, which allows air traffic controllers to identify aircraft with a high degree of accuracy, and provides pilots with more accurate information.
 At Wembley, there will be no additional transport provided or surface trains stopping, and there will be no on-site parking or public transport interchange.
 Concerns over the lack of public transportation have made it likely that the game will be played behind closed doors.
 A study published in the journal Science last Thursday announced that a new species of bird has formed on the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Despite the fact that researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have reported the evolution of a new species in just two generations, it is believed that the process would have taken much longer because of the breeding between the local species, the Darwin finch, the intermediate ground finch and the cactus finch, which came from the outside.
 Gold can be processed into all kinds of shapes. Even very small shapes can be rolled.
 It can be cut with a thin line, it can be bent or twisted, it can be beaten with a hammer or rolled with a sheet.
 "Gold can be made very thin and can be bonded to other metals. It was used to decorate the hand-painted illustrations in books called "illuminated manuscripts."
 This is called the pH of the chemical, and you can make a scale using red cabbage juice.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline (alkaline) the chemical is.
 pH levels are expressed as the amount of hydrogen (H in pH) ions in a tested chemical.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have lost an electron. (A hydrogen atom consists of one proton and one electron.)
 Dry the two powders together and then put them into the ball with wet clean hands after wetting.
 The moisture in your hands reacts with the outer layer to give it a funny feel and forms a kind of shell.
 The towns of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had elaborate sewage systems and flush toilets in nearly every house.
 Remains of sewage systems have been found in the houses of the Minoan cities of Santorini and Crete.
 Toilets were also found in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In Roman civilization, the toilet was sometimes part of a public bath, where men and women used the same facilities.
 If you're talking to someone thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 Satellites in space receive the signal and reflect it back almost immediately.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because Earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view.
 To put satellites or telescopes in space, you need a super-sized rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the most important being that it has given us a more convenient and faster means of transportation.
 It brought trains and cars and many other forms of transportation.
 Below that are medium-sized animals such as rabbits, hares, and deer, and medium-sized antelope.
 Finally, there are many more small cats (including pet cats) that eat much smaller prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their secret to success is the specialty of each cat, which prevents competition with other cats, the concept of exploiting a niche.
 Lions are the most social of the cat family, living in groups.
 A herd consists of one to three adult males, up to 30 females and their offspring.
 Females are closely related to each other because they are mostly from large, sister-rich families.
 Lion prides behave in ways that are remarkably similar to lions (but not to other large cats or canids), which is also extremely deadly to prey.
 Tigers are like versatile athletes, able to climb high places (not very well), swim, jump long distances, and run five times as fast as a human.
 Tigers are pack animals, like lions, leopards, and jaguars, and only these four cat species can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is different from the roar of the lion, but it is similar to the phrase of the word roaring.
 Ocelots enjoy eating small animals, preferably those that are much smaller than they are, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think that the osellot uses smell to track and find its prey.
 Ocelots are nocturnal, which means they are active at night and can see well in the dark. They hunt by ambushing prey, which they stalk and then pounce on.
 When a small population of organisms becomes separated from its main group (by moving to a mountain or river, or by being transported to a new island where they cannot move easily), they realize that they are in a different environment from the one they were in before.
 In these new environments, with different resources and competitors, new populations need different characteristics or adaptations to be competitive.
 The original population has not changed at all, but still needs to adapt as before.
 As time went on and new people began to adapt to the new environment, they began to look more and more different from each other.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two groups would look so different that they could not be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable outcome and a crucial part of evolution.
 Plants make the oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants use photosynthesis to make their own food and also provide shade.
 We build houses out of wood and make clothes out of plants. Most of the food we eat is vegetable. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the top predator of its time, so nothing was safe from it except other mosasaurs.
 The long jaw was filled with more than 70 very sharp teeth, and there were additional teeth in the roof of the mouth, meaning that no one could get past it.
 It is not known for sure, but it may have had a split tongue, and it may have eaten turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and even human flesh.
 This animal attacked anything that came into the water, and was a match for even the giant dinosaurs, like Tyrannosaurus.
 Their food was mostly familiar to us, but among the Roman feasting fare were some unusual and strange things, such as wild boar, fallow deer, snails, and even hibernating dormice.
 Another difference is that the poor and women sat on chairs and ate, while the rich men liked to recline on couches and eat together.
 Ancient Roman meals could not have included food that came to Europe from the Americas or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they didn’t eat corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cocoa, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a temple to the god Marduk, which they believed was the 'house of the gods'.
 People would bring offerings to the gods and priests would try to appease the gods through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary, which was accessible only to priests.
 Sometimes pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of a temple.
 The very top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The life of the Hebrew family was almost entirely out-of-doors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were just stalls on the street, and stones were used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled. In the Norse sagas they say that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder and sailed westward to discover Greenland, which he named.
 Regardless of his discovery, the Eskimos were already living there.
 Although each country belonged to the Scandinavian group, there were many differences between the peoples, kings, customs and histories of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the back of the Declaration of Independence is a treasure map.
 But that's not true. Even if there's something written on the back of the paper, it's not a treasure map.
 "The back of the Declaration of Independence has the words 'Original Declaration of Independence, July 4, 1776' written on it, upside down and backward."
 No one knows who wrote it, but the large parchment document (75.6 cm x 62.2 cm) was rolled up and stored away for many years.
 So it's likely that it was simply labeled.
 The D-Day landings and the subsequent battles liberated northern France, but the south remained free.
 "There was a Vichy French regime, which was a collaborationist regime of the French people who had chosen to make an alliance with Germany in 1940 rather than fight the invaders."
 "On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France, an operation called Operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces had liberated southern France and were turning their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a very large group of people who work and live together in cooperation, a single culture shared by a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, meaning citizen, civis, meaning city or city state, and civitas, meaning city or city state.
 The city-states were the pioneers of the nation-state. Civilization means the transmission of knowledge from one generation to another, the survival and equitable distribution of cultural heritage.
 Many cultures have left no significant historical evidence and are not treated as proper civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen colonies formed a loose confederation of states, with a weak central government consisting of a unicameral Congress as the only component.
 The Congress had no power to levy taxes, and there was no national executive or judiciary, so laws often had to be enforced by cooperative state authorities.
 Congress also had no power to nullify state laws and taxes.
 These amendments required unanimous approval from all states, and most state delegates, ignoring the central government, boycotted the convention.
 The Italian national football team is the second most successful team in the world, along with the German national football team, and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, baseball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and F1 car racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and Italian athletes sometimes compete in international competitions or the Olympics.
 Japan has almost 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest island in the world!
 "Japan's island chain/group of islands is why Japan is often called an "archipelago" from a geographical standpoint."
 Taiwan began with the name Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island, given to it by sailors from Europe in the 15th century.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in southwestern Taiwan, bringing changes to the way grain was produced, and hiring Chinese laborers to grow rice and sugar through a system of re-farming.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) army took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared Taiwan as part of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 After the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894–1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan and allowed it to govern the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures: the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edge have been reconstructed to allow tourists to better understand the original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of the site was restored, and restoration continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world is 35mm, which was the film size used primarily at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio has been inherited by the image sensor format of digital cameras.
 A little confusing, but the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format (the simplest integer ratio to get is 12:9) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (such as APS format) are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline for creating dynamism while maintaining the order of the image.
 This law states that the most effective position for the main subject is where the vertical and horizontal lines that divide the image into thirds intersect.
 During this period of European history, the wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was thoroughly investigated.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity bound European nations together despite differences in language and custom.
 Its pervasive power affects everyone from the king to the peasant.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's currency fund exists for that reason, in particular.
 The church’s central power had been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and wealth raised questions about the legitimacy of the doctrine.
 Immediately after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although these blockades violated international law, as generally accepted by several international conventions of the last two centuries, the strategy proved effective in cutting off vital military and civilian supplies.
 The British had mined the high seas to prevent any ship from entering any of the maritime zones, even neutral ships.
 Because the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response in the unrestricted submarine war.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing mood among most citizens and most states was pacifism and isolationism.
 Countries that had experienced the horrors of the First World War prayed that they would never again have to go through such a situation.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to work for the Edison Company in New York City.
 He arrived in America with a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former manager, a copy of Thomas Edison's book, and four cents in his pocket.
 In ancient China, there were different ways of indicating different eras, and each era or dynasty was distinguished by the ruling family.
 There were also periods of instability between the various dynasties, the most well-known being the 60-year period between the Han and the Jin dynasties, known as the Three Kingdoms period.
 During this period, there was a fierce war between many nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in battles to sit on the highest seat in the imperial palace in Xi'an.
 The use of the metric system, the transition from an absolute monarchy to a republic, the rise of nationalism and the idea that the nation was the property of the people and not of one ruler, all had a profound effect on society and politics.
 Also, after the revolution, jobs were opened to all male applicants, opening the way for the most ambitious and success-oriented people to succeed.
 Because of the current ability-based ranking system, the same is true for the military.
 The French Revolution also inspired workers in other countries who were oppressed to take up arms and make their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in issues that transcended this worldly life. He often used a cave known as Hira on Mount Noor (Light) for meditation.
 The cave, which has withstood the test of time, is a clear demonstration of Muhammad's religious inclinations.
 Perched on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, this cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it's not easy to find it, because once you're inside the cave, you're completely isolated.
 The only thing you can see from the mountain is the clear blue sky, and you can't see or hear anything from inside the cave.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the World that still exists.
 Built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century BC, the Great Pyramid was one of many huge pyramid structures built to honor the dead Pharaoh.
 "The Giza Plateau, in the Egyptian Death Valley or the Giza Necropolis, has several pyramids (the Great Pyramid being the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples and Sphinxes."
 The pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu and smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wife and family.
 The "olympia" mark is V-shaped, and the "deme" mark is a square without a staple or bottom.
 Drawing a bow is starting at the end of the bow and pulling the string, and releasing a bow is starting at the bowstring and releasing the bow.
 The upstroke usually makes a softer sound, while the downstroke makes a stronger, more confident sound.
 You may draw your own markings with a pencil, but the bow markings are for the purpose of the music competition and should be respected.
 The terrified King Louis XVI, Queen Marie Antoinette and their two young children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles) and the King's sister, Princess Elizabeth, were forced to leave Versailles for Paris on 6 October 1789 by a mob of women workers.
 The king and queen returned to Paris in a carriage surrounded by crowds who shouted and threatened them.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open their carriage windows.
 At one point, a member of the mob waved the head of the murdered royal guard in front of the terrified queen at the Tuileries Palace.
 The cost of the U.S. imperialist war to conquer the Philippines was paid for by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial government to pay for a large part of their expenses, and bonds in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks attracted interest.
 Of course, the super-profits derived from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute a basic element of the profits of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must understand the impetus for creating the Creation Order.
 The period in which the events took place is usually referred to as the High Middle Ages, and corresponds to the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (AD 1000-1300) in European history.
 The late Middle Ages, which preceded and followed the early Middle Ages, is conventionally considered to end around the year 1500.
 Technological determinism is a broad term encompassing a wide range of substantive ideas, from the technologically oriented or technological imperative to the more fundamental logic that human destiny is shaped by scientific laws and technology.
 "Most interpretations of technological determinism have two concepts: that technological development itself has a social influence beyond culture or politics, and that technology does not so much control society as it has a "natural" influence on it."
 For example, someone might argue that cars have led to the development of roads.
 However, the national road network is not cost-effective for a small number of cars, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 Also, as more people own vehicles, the number of road accidents increases, which in turn leads to new technological advances in the field of medical services to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many elements of cultural determinism, influenced by writers such as Goethe, Fichte, Schelling, and others.
 From a romantic perspective, geography shaped individuals, and over time, the customs and cultures associated with that geography grew, and it worked socially, and eventually, it was better than making laws arbitrarily.
 While Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern era, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 The reputation of the city as a center of luxury began around 400 AD and lasted until around 1100 AD.
 By the 12th century, Constantinople's prestige had declined, largely because the Crusaders returned with gifts such as silks and spices that were more valuable than the goods they sold in the Byzantine market.
 At this time the fashion capital moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 Initially, dress was heavily influenced by Byzantine culture in the East.
 However, because the exchange of information was slow, the Western style could be 25-30 years behind.
 Late medieval Europe began to develop its own style. One of the biggest developments of the time was that people started to use buttons to fasten their clothes, as a result of the Crusades.
 Subsistence farming is farming that is done by farmers and their families to produce only the amount of food they need.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, organic system that uses locally adapted seeds through crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yields.
 Historically, most farmers have been subsistence farmers and this is still valid in many developing countries.
 Subcultures allow people who feel marginalized by social norms to gather together and develop their own identities.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location and/or gender of the members.
 The defining feature of a subculture is the combination of linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, and geographic elements, which may or may not be distinct from the larger culture.
 Members of subcultures often express their sense of belonging through unique and symbolic styles that include fashion, mannerisms, and specific slang.
 One of the most common ways of demonstrating the importance of socialization is to use the example of a few unfortunate children who, for reasons of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called "feral children". Some feral children are confined, often by their parents, who are unable to accept their children's severe intellectual and physical disabilities.
 Wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children are claimed to have been raised by animals, and some children are said to have lived in the wild by themselves.
 When raised by non-human animals, wild animals behave like animals that require special care, such as fear or indifference to humans.
 Project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and scaffolding takes it one step further.
 Scaffolding is more of an assistant than a learning method. For example, it can help people learn new things, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 A metaphor can be both virtual and real, which means that the teacher is a metaphor of a form of scaffolding, but he can also be a little paper clip human of Microsoft Office.
 The virtual structure is built into the software and is there to prompt, prompt, and explain the steps that a student might find difficult to handle on their own.
 The reasons why a child is placed in foster care are as varied as neglect, abuse, and even kidnapping.
 All children should be raised in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment, but that is not the case.
 We consider the shelter system a safe haven for these children.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, caring foster parents, stable education, and reliable health care.
 Foster care should be able to provide all the essential elements that were not met in the existing family.
 The Internet has both a collective communication and a communication between people.
 The distinctive nature of the Internet leads to additional dimensions in terms of access and satisfaction.
 "For example, 'learning' and 'socialization' have been suggested as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995)."
 Amey and MacCord (1998) found that when they surveyed viewer reactions to Web sites, "personal involvement" and "continuing relationship" were identified as new motivating factors.
 By using video recordings, we were able to make important discoveries in the interpretation of the subtle facial expressions and movements that lasted only a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it claims to be able to detect whether a person is lying by accurately interpreting subtle facial expressions.
 Oliver Cromwell, in his speech to the Rump Parliament, showed that people could correctly perceive the sincerity of a person despite not being able to understand what he said due to brain damage.
 He even suggested that pets like dogs also possess this ability to analyze human behavior.
 Twentieth-century research has shown that there are two hidden or apparent genetic variants.
 Mutations create new species of genes, and selection removes the expressed genes from the population.
 Separation and recombination mixes the mutations that have occurred between the two gene pools in each generation.
 In the savanna, primates with human-like digestive systems have a hard time getting enough amino acids from the available plant resources.
 In addition, the failure of this leads to serious consequences - impaired growth, malnutrition, and eventually death.
 The most readily available plant-based resources are leaves or proteins from legumes, but these are difficult for us primates to digest without cooking.
 In contrast, animal foods such as ants, termites and eggs provide high-quality protein with essential amino acids that are easily digested.
 "All things considered, it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the 'protein problem' in the same way that chimpanzees in the savannah do today."
 Sleep disturbance is a process of deliberately waking up during normal sleeping hours and then falling asleep again after a short period of time (10–60 minutes).
 This can be done easily by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up without fully rousing you.
 If you turn off your alarm clock while you sleep, you can put the clock in a far corner of the room so that you have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biological rhythm-based options include forcing people to drink large amounts of water (particularly water or diuretics) before bed and urinating.
 The amount of equanimity a person possesses is related to the amount of insecurity that is inherent in his body and soul.
 The less you worry, the more positive energy you will have in your life. Everyone has the ability to find absolute peace and satisfaction.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment; the only obstacle to this goal is our own inner anxiety and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been expanded upon by many of the ideas of Mahayana Buddhism and the techniques of Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism is, in theory, very simple: it consists of kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that embraces all.
 When you practice Kundalini yoga, you awaken the Kundalini energy through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualization.
 At the heart of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse energy channels, activate chakras, and create enlightened states.
 In World War II, Germany was a common enemy and this led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. The clash of systems, changes and cultures that followed the end of the war led to the decline of many nations.
 Two years later, the former allies were now enemies and the Cold War had begun.
 The Cold War would last another 40 years, and the real fighting would be done by proxy armies on the battlefields of Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defences had already collapsed, and the only hope was to retreat along the Romanian bridgehead and regroup.
 However, these plans were rendered useless when more than 800,000 Soviet troops invaded eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international treaties (bilateral and multilateral) and entered Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts, creating the Belorussian and Ukrainian Fronts.
 Shipping goods by sea is the most efficient way to move large numbers of people and large amounts of goods across the ocean.
 The Navy's mission has traditionally been to transport people and goods, but also to prevent the enemy from doing so.
 One of the most notable recent examples was the North Atlantic Campaign of World War II. The Americans tried to move manpower and resources across the Atlantic to help the British.
 At the same time, the German Navy, which used U-boats primarily, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would have been able to conquer Britain and the rest of Europe.
 Sheep farming is thought to have begun in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to keep them to make it easier to use milk, fur, meat and leather.
 Cattle goats are usually kept in herds on hillsides or in pastures, often under the care of a herdsman, usually a child or adolescent, a practice still in use today.
 The Mace is built in England in the early 16th century.
 The macadam road was made of only parallel wooden planks, but it was faster than the rougher roads of the time and could carry more loads.
 Sleepers were introduced quite early to fix the track. However, it was gradually found that rails on iron sleepers were more efficient.
 This became a common practice, but iron made wooden cart wheels wear out more quickly.
 As time went on, wooden wheels were replaced by iron ones, and in 1767 the first railroad was introduced.
 The first known means of transportation for humans was walking, and with the appearance of Homo erectus 2 million years ago, humans began to walk upright.
 Their ancestor, Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright like them.
 Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal 7 million years ago, but the best-preserved examples of bipedalism are in Australopithecus, which appeared 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly lives, and we can join environmental movements, and we can become activists to reduce the suffering we will experience in the future.
 This is similar to symptom treatment in many cases, but in order to not just be a temporary solution, the source of the problem must be found and that part disabled.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot with the advancement of human technology, and the problem has become more serious because of overpopulation and humanity's luxurious lifestyle.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, the president of the Congress, John Hancock, and the secretary, Charles Thomson, signed it and sent it to the printer John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 During the night, 150 to 200 copies of what is now called the Dartmouth Broadside were printed.
 On July 8, 1976, the document was first read aloud by John Nixon in front of the Independence Hall.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, and he read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that are still known to exist are the oldest surviving copies of this document; the handwritten originals are no longer extant.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and have lived on to the present day. We call them birds.
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many things that make birds look like dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, lay eggs, and walk on two legs like Tyrannosaurus.
 Most computers in use today use a method of manipulating information by encoding it in binary code.
 Binary numbers can have only two values, either 0 or 1, and these numbers are called binary numbers or bits in computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not have immediate symptoms. Symptoms such as vomiting are so common that they cannot be immediately diagnosed.
 The most obvious sign of a poisoning is a container that appears to have been opened and left open, containing medication or household chemicals.
 Check the table for specific emergency instructions for specific poisons.
 The term bug is a term entomologists use to refer to these types of insects with a certain amount of formality.
 The term is derived from the parasitic insect, the common housefly, which has been known since ancient times.
 Both the carpet beetle and the bed bug are chronic insects, adapting to their hosts' habitats and living quarters.
 The most common neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults, multiple sclerosis (MS) affects an estimated 400,000 people across the United States.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS) is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerves.
 Women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis, according to a new study.
 The couple may decide that raising a baby is not in their best interest or that of the child.
 These couples may choose to adopt a baby.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main purpose of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which is how most scientific research is done.
 But experiments are about eliminating one or more hypotheses, asking questions, and leading to scientific inquiry.
 Scholars and philosophers focused on classical texts and especially the Latin Bible.
 In science, including psychology, the Aristotelian view of all matter was accepted.
 As knowledge of Greek declined, the West became disconnected from the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 Many of the rhythms observed in physiology and behavior are critically dependent on the existence of a biological clock and its production of endogenous cycles.
 Most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals, have a circadian rhythm, not just a response to external cues.
 The biological clock is a self-maintaining oscillator that can continue to run even in the absence of signals from the outside.
 Hershey and Chase's experiment was one of the leading studies that suggested DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phage, or viruses, to insert the bacteria into their DNA.
 They did two experiments: one to check DNA in the pearls when they were radioactive, and one to check the proteins in the pearls when they were radioactive.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected genetic material, and whether the affected cells are germline cells.
 Only mutations in the germ line cells can be passed on to offspring, and mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts people interested in nature exploration for the purpose of viewing landscapes, including plants and wildlife.
 Examples of field activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching and research on parks and ecosystems.
 A trip to Borneo's Orangutan Island, photos, learning, etc. is one example.
 Every morning, people leave the small town in their cars to go to work, passing the place where they just left, where other people are going to work.
 This dynamic shuttle system connects and supports everyone with a car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now scientific data show that this carbon economy, on a vast scale, has thrown the biosphere out of the stable state that helped human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society, uses the transportation system, and almost everyone complains about the transportation system.
 In the developed world, we rarely hear complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transport systems cause such frustration, and why do they so often fail to live up to expectations? Are transport engineers all incompetent? Or is there something more fundamental at work?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles and the interactions they have with each other between two points.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study traffic flow because drivers' behavior cannot be predicted 100 percent.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range, so traffic flow has a reasonable degree of consistency and can be mathematically approximated.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, three key characteristics were set up in relation to each other: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly. The ability to fly helped insects to escape predators more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back against their bodies.
 This gives them a wider range of smaller places to hide from predators.
 Today, insects that cannot fold their wings are only moths and flies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people believed that he was right, that the solar system (and other stars) revolved around the Earth, but many did not.
 It seems like the earth is not moving, doesn't it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest river in the world and the largest by volume. It carries more than eight times the volume of the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on Earth, sometimes reaching a width of 6 miles.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the earth's rivers into the sea comes from the Amazon.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long, and its basin is formed by the confluence of thousands of smaller rivers.
 Pyramid building continued until the last moments of the Old Kingdom, but in size and technical excellence it could never match the Pyramids of Giza.
 Ancient Egyptians were amazed by the monumental architecture of their ancestors, which was more than 1,000 years old by their standards.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, the smallest independent state in the world and the smallest country by population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for legislative and official communications.
 Italian is also a vernacular language, unlike Latin, which is used frequently in religious ceremonies, but is not spoken by most people working in the state.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, and copper since ancient times, because they are all found in nature in their natural forms and are relatively simple to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that all matter was composed of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was similar to the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas and plasma (in that order), but Aristotle also theorized that they were changing into new elements that make up what we see.
 An alloy is basically a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements on the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, as are the metals gold and silver.
 There are also alloys that contain small amounts of non-metals, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that a few thousand of them could fit inside the period at the end of this sentence.
 So, the pencil came into being and the pencil has remained a good tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, the advent of newer writing styles has led to less use of pencils and they have been pushed to the back of the classroom.
 Now people don’t need to get close to a pencil sharpener to write messages on a computer screen.
 People are wondering what the keyboard will look like if something new is created.
 Nuclear fission bombs are based on the principle that a large amount of energy is required to bring together nuclei with many neutrons and protons.
 It's like pulling a heavy wagon up a hill. If you split the nucleus again, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to split on their own, with very little outside influence or no outside conditions at all.
 "The surface of the Moon is made of rock and dust, and the outer layer of the Moon is called the 'crust.'"
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km thick on the far side.
 Crust is thinner under Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 The crust is thinner, so there may be more maria near the surface, where it is easier for lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theory focuses on what causes people to behave in certain ways or leads them to behave in certain ways.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs or needs that are internalized until they become adults.
 These theories look at who certain people are and what in their environment makes them do certain things and not others.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Typically, two behaviors can emerge as a manager begins to lead his or her former peers: one at the end of the spectrum, trying to remain "one of the guys," and the other at the other end, trying to be "one of the bosses."
 Managers of this type are not well-liked for making unpopular decisions, for disciplining, for evaluating performance and assigning responsibility, and for holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the team member becomes an unrecognized individual who thinks that he or she has to change everything that the team has been doing and make it his or her own.
 Ultimately, the success of a team is the responsibility of the leader.
 Such behavior causes confusion among the team leader and members.
 Virtual teams maintain the same standards of excellence as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for the real members.
 They often have more autonomy than the traditional team members because they can meet with teams across time zones that the local management team doesn't understand.
 The very existence of the "true" "transparent team" (Larsen and LaPas, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team that each member reports to. This team sets the standards for each member.
 Why does it take so long for organizations to establish learning communities? One goal of implementing a structured learning concept is innovation.
 When all available resources are used efficiently in an organization's business units, creativity and innovation can flourish.
 As a result, the process of overcoming obstacles together can lead to new innovative processes to meet the needs of customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create an innovation culture as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) describes an approach called Continuum to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide the necessary physical evidence when a theoretical approach is taken to the study of cognitive abilities, narrowing the field of study and making it more precise.
 Correlations between brain pathology and behavior help scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, lesions, tumors, and other conditions can affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The advent of new technologies has allowed us to observe and investigate brain structure and function in ways that were previously impossible.
 This provides a wealth of information and data to create a simulation model that helps us understand the inner workings of the mind.
 AI conjures up visions of science fiction, but it is a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of computers.
 AI research includes work to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior from machines.
 For example, handwriting, voice, face recognition, as well as control, planning, scheduling and customer diagnostics and answering questions are included.
 These have become separate disciplines that focus on providing solutions to problems that arise in real life.
 AI systems are now frequently used in the economic, medical, engineering and military fields, as seen in many home computers and video game software.
 Field trips are a big part of every class. Teachers generally want to take their students to places that don't require a bus ride.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips, where students can view museum exhibits, visit an aquarium, and view beautiful works of art from the comfort of their classroom.
 Virtual field trips are a great way to reflect on field trips and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year students from Bennett High School in North Carolina design a website about a state trip, and each year the website is redesigned and the previous version is archived on an online server.
 Blogging also helps to improve students' writing. Students often start blogs with poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of readers usually changes that.
 Since most students are the most critical audience, blog writers begin to try to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 "Blogs also make students "more interested in what is going on around them" and "more intelligent and interesting" through the need to attract an audience (Totoro, 2004)."
 Blogging is a tool that encourages collaboration and helps students extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 "The appropriate use of blogs "promotes analytical and critical thinking by actively responding to Internet resources and allows students to define their own position in the texts of others and to formulate their own views on a particular topic (Oravec, 2020)."
 Ottawa is Canada's charming capital city where two languages are spoken, and its diverse art galleries and museums illuminate Canada's past and present.
 In the south, there is Niagara Falls, and in the north, there are untouched natural beauties such as Muskoka.
 All these things make Ontario stand out as the true Canada to outsiders.
 The northern part of the country is sparsely populated, and some areas are almost uninhabited.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: There are more African Americans living in the United States than there are Canadians.
 The islands of East Africa lie along the eastern coast of Africa and are located in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent or associated with France and are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 Islam was also introduced by the Arabs, and there was a great change in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape Route from Europe to India.
 The north is bordered by the Sahel, and the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west.
 Women: All female travelers are encouraged to answer as married, regardless of whether they are actually married.
 Wearing a ring can also help (but expensive rings are best avoided).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can result in what is perceived as harassment and that such behavior is not uncommon, such as holding a woman's arm.
 Don't be afraid to say no to men, and to stand up for yourself (cultural differences aside, harassment is not to be tolerated!).
 Modern-day Casablanca was founded in the 10th century by Berber fishermen and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and the Merinids.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, but abandoned it after the 1755 earthquake.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city of Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish merchants who established a trading post here called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old Medina, you can easily find places selling traditional Moroccan products such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and a variety of other items, but all of them are for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, especially the roads of the town, including the city center.
 Goma is quite safe, but if you are visiting Goma from outside, you should do some research to understand the ongoing conflict in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the base for some of the cheapest mountain gorilla trekking and Nyiragongo volcano climbing in Africa.
 You can get around Goma using a moto-taxi (motorcycle taxi). The regular (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combining the meaning of 'impossible to reach', 'Timbuktu' became a metaphor for a far-off, exotic place.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor village, but it has become a tourist attraction because of its fame and has an airport.
 Due to the effects of desert sand, in 1990 Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the most prominent expeditions in Henry Louis Gates' PBS special "In Search of the African Diaspora."
 The city is more Arab than African, and stands in stark contrast to other Malian cities.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeastern part of South Africa, bordered by Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different zones, each supporting different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's most popular attractions and the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 Like all South African national parks, there is a conservation levy and entrance fee to the park.
 It may be worthwhile to purchase a wild card that allows you to enter a specific park in South Africa or the entire South African National Parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the place where Hong Kong was named and where many tourists focus on.
 The skyline of Hong Kong is a shimmering graph, because the buildings line up on the water of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views in Hong Kong, head to the Kowloon waterfront, across the harbour from Hong Kong Island.
 Most of Hong Kong's land development is concentrated along the northern coast, which has been reclaimed.
 This is where the British colonial developers made their mark, so if you're looking for evidence of the former colonial territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest mangrove belt, stretching 80 km (50 mi) from the coast of Bangladesh to the Sundarbans National Park in India.
 Sundarbans is a UNESCO World Heritage Site and a part of the Sundarbans National Park, which is located within the Indian territory.
 This forest is not just a simple mangrove swamp. It is part of the last remnants of the great jungle that once covered the Ganges Plains.
 The Sundarbans is 3,850 km² in area, of which about one third is covered by water and marshy land.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans is a wildlife sanctuary. It is estimated that there are 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the area.
 Buses run all day from the intercity bus station (across the river), but buses to the east and to Zacatecas/Bombolon only leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Intercity buses are often 1000 baht and it is advisable to buy tickets in advance.
 In most areas, comfortable and sturdy minibus shuttle buses are used.
 Shared taxis are a quick and comfortable way to travel to nearby areas, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the Oyapock River and the Brazilian city of Oiapoque and the French overseas department of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers are 83 m high, the bridge is 378 m long, and there are two 3.50 m wide lanes.
 The vertical gap under the bridge is 15 meters, and the construction was completed in August 2011, and the prohibition of passage of the corresponding bridge is until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to be fully operational in September 2017, when the construction of the Brazilian customs inspection station is completed.
 The Guaraníes are the most important indigenous group, living in eastern Paraguay, and were semi-sedentary hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, known as the "Land of the Guaraníes", was born in the 16th century as a result of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and the indigenous people.
 The Spanish people began a three-century-long colonial era.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has retained a great deal of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the Polo Grounds in Las Canitas.
 Smaller tournaments and matches can be seen here at other times of the year.
 For news of tournaments and to find out where to buy tickets for polo matches, check out the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), which is fixed at par with the British pound sterling (GBP).
 FIC West Store is located right across the street from Stanley, the island's only bank.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands, and American dollars and credit cards are also widely accepted.
 British and US currency are accepted in the relevant territories, but credit cards are not. You should check with the owner in advance to find out what forms of payment are accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the Falkland Islands pound outside the islands, so exchange it before you leave.
 Montevideo is located south of the equator, so when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is a subtropical region, with temperatures usually over 30°C in summer.
 Winters can be incredibly cold, with temperatures dropping below freezing on occasion, but the wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than it actually is.
 There is no "wet season" and "dry season" as such, the rainfall is almost the same throughout the year.
 While many of the park's animals are used to seeing people, they still retain their wildness and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to park officials, you must be at least 100 yards/meters from bears and wolves, and 25 yards/meters from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may appear, elephants, elk, moose, bears and almost all large animals can attack.
 Dozens of visitors are injured each year by not keeping a proper distance from these animals, which are large, wild and dangerous.
 Additionally, smells can attract bears and other wildlife, so you should avoid cooking or carrying smelly foods and keep your campsite clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is on the island of Upolu and has a population of just over 40,000.
 Apia was established in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was a famous naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the British warships sank, and about 200 Americans and Germans died.
 During the period of the Mau movement, which was organised to fight for independence, a peaceful meeting in the village resulted in the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Because Auckland is split by two harbours, there are many beaches, the most popular of which are within three areas.
 North Shore Beach (North Harbour) is on the Pacific Ocean, stretching from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It is a safe swimming beach for almost all beaches, and most of them are shaded by pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is located at the Waitemata Harbour in the suburb of St Heliers, between Mission Bay and the central city of Auckland.
 These beaches are usually family-friendly and uncrowded, and there are a variety of shops along the waterfront.
 The main local beer is Number One, which is not complex but a refreshing, light beer. Another local beer is Manta.
 There are many French wines to try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are also easily available.
 Local tap water is safe to drink, but bottled water is readily available if you are concerned.
 The concept of 'flat white' coffee is unfamiliar to Australians, who are used to short blacks being 'espressos' and cappuccinos coming with a thick cream (not foam) on top, and tea being served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juice is expensive but very tasty.
 I make many dives in this reef area throughout the year, but injuries from these causes are rare.
 Still, you should listen to the advice of the officials and be careful to follow all the signs and pay close attention to the safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish occur from October to April, near beaches and estuaries, and occasionally are found outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people; most sharks are afraid of people and swim away.
 The sea crocodile does not live in the sea, but mainly in the river mouths north of Rockhampton.
 By booking in advance, travelers have the peace of mind that there will be a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agents often have special deals on certain hotels, but you can also book other types of accommodation, such as camping sites, through them.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport pickup/transfers, and a cruise ship.
 We may also hold a reservation for you if you need time to make a decision or to obtain other documents (e.g. visa) for your destination.
 However, if you have any modification or request, you should not contact the hotel directly, but first contact the travel agency.
 At some festivals, many people who attend the music festival decide to camp on the site, and most attendees feel that it is a must-experience.
 To be close to the fun and excitement, you should get there early and secure a campsite near the music.
 Although the main stage may be over, don't forget that there's still music to be heard all over the festival until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 When crossing the North Sea in winter, the ship passes through ice and the noise is quite horrible, so it is better to check the location of the room.
 The St. Petersburg cruise includes time in the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (please check the terms and conditions).
 Casinos generally make every effort to maximize the time and money spent by their patrons, usually by not having windows or clocks, and by making it difficult to find the exit.
 They keep visitors coming back by always having special food, drinks, and entertainment.
 Some places offer free drinks, but alcohol dulls your judgment and good gamblers know the importance of not getting drunk.
 If you are driving over high altitudes or mountain roads, you should consider the possibility of snow, ice, or freezing temperatures.
 On icy or snow-covered roads, the friction is reduced, so you can't drive as well as you would on a dry asphalt road.
 Snowstorms can come on quickly and a lot of snow can fall, making it difficult to walk.
 It can also be limited by falling or blowing snow, raindrops, or ice on the windshield.
 In contrast, many countries have roads that are icy or snow-covered all year round, and most roads are not blocked for long.
 The safari is probably the most spectacular tourist attraction in Africa and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari, which is widely known, refers to overland travel, especially in the savannas of Africa, to see the wildlife.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach vehicles closely and can be observed well with standard equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy, so binoculars can help you see them better.
 "Hiking safaris ("bush walks", "hiking safaris" or "wildlife safaris") are hiking-based safaris that can last for hours or days."
 The Paralympic Games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in multiple locations across Japan.
 Tokyo, which hosted the 1964 Summer Olympics, will be the only city in Asia to have hosted the Summer Games twice.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement, you may be in a bit of a pickle.
 Refund policies vary, but as of the end of March, most of the cancellation policies for the Olympics in 2020 have not been extended beyond July 2020.
 Most event tickets are priced between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, and the average ticket price is around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels do not have irons and ironing boards in the rooms, but they are available for rent.
 You may not have an iron or like to wear ironed socks, in which case you can use a hair dryer.
 Be careful not to overheat the fabric (it may shrink or discolor).
 There are other ways to purify water, some of which are more effective at certain hazards.
 In some areas, it is sufficient to boil water for one minute, while in other areas it is necessary to boil water for several minutes.
 Water filters vary in effectiveness, and in areas of concern, it is recommended to purchase bottled water from a reputable brand.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not common in their home country.
 Pests can spoil food, cause inflammation or, worse, cause allergic reactions, spread toxins or spread disease.
 Diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill a person by force, are not usually considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping is an opportunity to buy goods that are exempt from tax and VAT in certain areas.
 Travelers from countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot of money, especially when buying alcohol or cigarettes.
 The road between Point Marion and Fairmont, located in a remote mountainous area, is known as one of the most difficult roads to drive on the entire Bypass.
 If you are not used to driving in the countryside, be careful of steep slopes, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower than on the previous and following sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) - and compliance is much more important within the section than on the other sections.
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at many other points along this route, such as at Pennsylvania Furnace.
 German pastries are quite good, and in Bavaria, they are similar to their southern neighbors in Austria, with lots of butter and variety.
 Fruit pastries are common, with apples going into pastries all year round, and cherries and plums usually in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. Popular cakes are especially well combined with strong coffee.
 If you want a small, flavorful loaf, try a berliner, a pfannkuchen, or a krapfen, depending on where you are.
 Curry is a dish that is based on medicinal herbs and spices, with meat or vegetables.
 "Curry can be ""thick"" or ""thin"" depending on the amount of water used."
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in southern India and other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is more commonly used.
 Indonesian food is a catch-all term for the many regional cuisines of the country's 17,000 islands.
 However, when used without qualification, the term tends to refer to the food of the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, the Javanese cuisine is characterized by a variety of simple seasonal dishes, and the main flavors favored by Javanese are peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and various spices.
 The backrest is a support for the rider's feet, which is placed on the sides of the saddle.
 This device gives the rider a lot more stability, but it can be a safety issue because the foot can get caught.
 If a person riding a horse falls off and gets their foot caught in the stirrup, they can be dragged along by the horse. There are several safety precautions that can be taken to minimize this risk.
 First, most riders wear a saddle with a high pommel and a narrow, close-fitting saddle.
 Next, some saddles, particularly those in the UK, have a safety bar that can be pulled back to prevent the saddle from falling off the horse if the rider falls backwards.
 Cochamó Valley - The best climbing area in Chile, known as the Yosemite Valley of South America, with a variety of granite walls and rocky peaks.
 There are breathtaking views from the mountain peaks. Climbers from all over the world come to explore the endless potential of nature.
 Ski and snowboarding, including freeride skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve sliding down snow-covered terrain with skis or a snowboard attached to your feet.
 "Skiing is a form of recreation enjoyed by skiers, known as ski bums, who plan their vacations around skiing."
 The idea of skiing is very old. Cave paintings depicting skiers date back to 5,000 B.C.
 As a sport, downhill skiing dates back at least to the 17th century, and the first recreational ski club was founded in 1861 by Norwegians in Australia.
 Skiing: This activity is also called backcountry skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing and mountaineering, but usually does not include them, and in the latter case is done on steep terrain and requires much harder skiing and boots.
 Think of ski courses as similar to hiking courses.
 On good conditions you can go a little further than walking, but without well-maintained tracks and heavy backpacks you will not get the speed of cross-country skiing.
 Europe is a continent with many independent countries, so usually traveling between several of them means going through several visa applications and passport checks.
 But the Schengen zone functions somewhat like a country in this regard.
 As long as you stay in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, with a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa individually in each Schengen country, which saves you time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of antiques. In some countries, anything over 100 years old is considered an antique.
 North America has a geographic difference that makes it seem younger than Europe, because it is less defined as antiques.
 Handmade items may not be as durable as mass-produced counterparts, but they can still be defined as antiques.
 Reindeer herding is one of the Sami people's main livelihoods and in trade, such culture is also important to other people.
 Traditionally, not all Sámi have been involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, but most have lived by herding reindeer as pack animals, supplementing their income with fishing and hunting.
 Today, many Sami work in modern trade. Tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sápmi.
 It is widely used by non-Roma, but Roma people often find it offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of them.
 If the country you are visiting becomes a travel alert area, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You may want to hear the government's opinion rather than your own, but the advice of each country's government is tailored to its own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may find themselves in a different situation than Europeans or Arabs.
 The alert is just a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are primarily superficial, general, and overly simplified, compared to more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Adverse weather is a general term for any hazardous weather condition that may cause damage, disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types depending on the region, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Windstorms, hail, excessive precipitation, and wildfires are forms and effects of adverse weather.
 Local and seasonal adverse weather phenomena include storms, blizzards, hail, and dust storms.
 Travelers should look up the local weather beforehand to avoid any hiccups in their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country considered a combat zone should be sure to receive professional training.
 An Internet search for 'hostile environment course' will probably give you the local company's address.
 The lectures usually cover much more detail on all the issues discussed here, and are usually accompanied by practical experience.
 The course is usually 2-5 days long and involves role-playing, various first aid training, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about wild survival are common, but publications about war zones are rare.
 Travelers planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documentation when they return.
 Whether to issue a passport with an "X" for gender or to update the documents to reflect the name and gender a person wants is up to each government.
 The willingness of foreign governments to accept these documents is also very variable.
 In the post-9/11 era, airport security screening has become even more of a hassle.
 Transgender people before surgery should not expect to pass the scanner because their privacy and dignity are not respected.
 Rip currents are often caused by waves breaking on reefs or other underwater obstacles.
 Due to the systematic stratification in the water column, the return water is concentrated in some deep places, which can form from rapid currents to deep water.
 Most of them die of exhaustion after trying to swim against the current, which is often impossible.
 If you can get out of the current, it's not that hard to swim back to shore.
 You may want to look for a place where you won't be swept back into the current, or you may want to wait for rescue depending on your swimming ability or whether you were spotted by someone else.
 Culture shock may occur more quickly, last longer, and be more severe than culture shock because there is no honeymoon phase.
 Travelers who have not had any difficulty adjusting to a new culture often have a particularly hard time adjusting back to their native culture.
 When returning home after living abroad, they may find themselves adapting to the culture of the country they are in while losing some of the habits of their own culture.
 When you first went abroad, you knew that travelers had to adjust to a new country, so most people were patient and understanding.
 People may not think that patience and understanding are needed for travelers on their way home.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see the pyramids in silence before the show starts.
 You always hear the sounds of tourists and vendors, and the story of light and sound is like a storybook.
 The Sphinx is set as the background and narrator of the long story.
 Scenes were projected on the pyramids and fires were lit on other pyramids.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and in 2020, 16 countries have bases there.
 The system is located about 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula, and the largest is the King George Island, where the Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Other highlights include Livingston Island and Deception Island, which are still active volcanoes and offer natural harbours filled with water.
 Ellesmere Island is located on the southern tip of the peninsula and is bordered by the Baffin Bay.
 The mountains of the peninsula rise to high plateaus and then recede to form a 360-kilometer-long belt of the Elysian Mountains, which are divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern region or the Centennial Mountains is home to the highest mountain in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which is 4,892 metres high.
 If you are in a remote area where your cell phone does not have coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones are not usually a replacement for cell phones because they require a direct line of sight to a satellite and a clear view of the sky.
 The service is frequently used for maritime transportation, including ferries, and for places where voice and data services are needed.
 You will receive more information from your local telecommunications provider about this service connection.
 The number of people using Gap Year for travel and study is increasing.
 This is especially popular with graduates, who can take a year out of their studies without it being a huge burden on their studies.
 In most cases, enrolling in a gap year course abroad can actually increase your chances of getting into higher education back home.
 Generally, there is a fee to enroll in these training programs.
 "Finland is a great place to enjoy boating. "The Land of a thousand lakes" has thousands of islands on its lakes and coastal archipelagos."
 In the archipelago and the lakes, you don't need a yacht.
 Although the coastal islands and large lakes are large enough for any yacht, it is also a different experience to be on a smaller boat or even a kayak.
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with one boat per seven to eight people.
 This is similar to cases in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is quite unusual outside these countries (New Zealand has one case per 40,000 people).
 Certainly, most Baltic Sea cruises offer a long stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can spend a couple of days exploring the historic city and then return to the cruise ship for a night's sleep.
 If you are going to the coast on a cruise ship, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruises advertise Berlin, Germany, but as you can see on the map above, Berlin is not near the sea and visiting the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be a scary experience for anyone, but especially for those who have never flown before or are afraid of flying.
 This is not something to be ashamed of, and is no different from the personal fears, disgusts and aversions that most people have for other things.
 For some people, understanding how airplanes work and what happens during a flight, or overcoming fears based on not having control, can help.
 Courier companies are paid a lot of money to deliver things quickly, and often time is of the essence when it comes to business documents, emergency repairs or spare parts.
 Large companies use their own aircraft on some routes, but for other routes or small companies, there is a problem.
 If it was sent by air freight, it may take several days to clear customs and collect your baggage on some routes.
 The only way to get it processed faster was to send it as checked baggage, which airline regulations do not allow without a passenger on board.
 The only sure way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money to be privileged (or have your company pay for you).
 So it's not cheap - it can cost up to four times the price of a business class ticket or up to 11 times the price of a first class ticket!
 Generally, a direct flight from Area A to Area B, whether in business or first class, is not worth the effort of trying to get a seat discount.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The language is Romanian, but Russian is widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered from ethnic strife.
 The conflict in 1994 created the Transnistria Republic, an independent state with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Although political negotiations between the two Moldovas failed, economic relations were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Eastern Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million and is the second largest port and a very good transportation hub after Istanbul.
 Once an ancient city, Smyrna is now a modern, developed, bustling commercial center surrounded by mountains and a huge bay.
 The city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey, but amidst the wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings, and modern shopping centers are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets, and old mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can see the nearby island of Eysturoy, and there is an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard there are some interesting marble carvings of doves on some of the tombs.
 It's worth spending 30 minutes to walk around this interesting town.
 To the north is the easily accessible, romantic and enchanting village of Sintra, a city famous with foreigners for its praise of the magnificence recorded by Byron.
 The Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, to the north is the world-famous Shrine of Our Lady of Fatima, a place of Marian apparitions.
 Remember that this is basically a huge cemetery and a place of great significance to a large part of the world's population, which is almost impossible to calculate.
 There are still many people here who survived, who lost loved ones here, who were killed here, who were worked to death here, whether they were Jewish or not.
 Please show respect, dignity and reverence to this place. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not scratch or deface the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Half of the population prefers to use Catalan, the majority understands the language and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, the official language established by law.
 However, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, but in the event of an unscheduled service interruption, the system automatically switches to Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 "This is usually a misconception, but the best way to live in Paris is to behave like a ""bien élevé(well-bred)"" person. This will make your life easier."
 The Parisians' brusque exterior will quickly disappear if you show them basic courtesy.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is mostly covered by dense forests of beech, hornbeam, fir and alpine and Mediterranean plants.
 The wide range of microclimates, different soils and different elevations result in a wide range of plant species.
 The area is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, rare species such as the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, vulture, wild cat and great bustard are found alongside many more common species.
 During a visit to the monastery, women must wear a skirt that covers their knees and their shoulders must be covered.
 Most monasteries will provide a hood that can be pulled over for women visitors who have not brought their own, but if you bring a brightly colored hood with you, you will be greeted at the entrance by a monk or nun with a smile.
 Along the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 You can rent them at the entrance, but since you don't wash them every time you use them, it can be uncomfortable to wear these kimonos. You can wear them in one size for all men!
 Like the food of the Mediterranean, the food of Majorca is based on bread, vegetables, meat (especially pork) and olive oil.
 A simple, and particularly popular summer meal, is the Pâté en Mousse, a bread with cheese or tuna, and tomato and olive oil, which is easy to find.
 All nouns that are used with the word Sie, meaning you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish some verbs and nouns.
 It is a little complicated to find out whether a verb or adjective is used in the form of a noun phrase in writing, but it certainly makes reading easier.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch out for are c and g, as they change depending on the vowel that follows them.
 You also have to pronounce r and rr differently. Caro means dear, but carro means cart.
 Persian is relatively easy and has a mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar introduction will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and understand the phrases better.
 It goes without saying that if you know Romance languages, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who know a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is so similar to Spanish that it is not worth learning separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are mostly obsolete today and are used as museums or educational sites.
 In their day, light pollution was not at the level it is today, so they were located in places that were easily accessible, such as cities and campuses.
 Most modern research telescopes are large facilities located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The cherry blossom viewing event, known as Hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 This concept is derived from China, where the plum blossom is chosen as a part of culture.
 The first cherry blossom party in Japan was held in the Imperial Palace grounds, hosted by the Emperor. Only members of the Imperial family and nobility were invited.
 "Plants look so nice in their natural environment that the temptation to take just one sample is hard to resist."
 "If you visit a formally arranged garden and collect 'specimens', you are bound to be chased away."
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, very convenient to get around, and you can buy almost anything after you arrive.
 "But if you are located in the ""hot"" zone, a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to deal with high temperatures (always high) and strong sunshine (rarely clear)."
 There are also buses to Hebron, where the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives, are traditionally buried.
 You should make sure that the bus you want to take is going to Kiryat Arba, the Jewish town near Hebron, and not to Hebron itself.
 Inland waterways can be a great subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Loire and Rhine valleys, or take a cruise to an interesting place on the Danube River, or take a boat ride along the Seine.
 They also have popular hiking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions surrounding the holiday have become universalized to non-Christian and non-Christian people around the world.
 There is a tradition of staying awake on Easter night to watch the sunrise.
 Of course there is a Christian theological explanation for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian spring and harvest ritual.
 More traditional churches hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night of Holy Week, where the congregation often celebrates the Resurrection at midnight.
 All the animals that first arrived on the island either swam, flew, or floated to the island.
 Mammals could not travel as far from the mainland as the Galapagos's primary grazers, the giant tortoises.
 Since humans arrived on the Galapagos, many mammals, including goats, horses, donkeys, rats, cats and dogs, have been introduced to the islands.
 If you visit the polar regions in winter, you will experience the polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 The sky is dark all day long, so it offers a good opportunity to see the aurora.
 The area is not densely populated, so light pollution is not a problem, and it is possible to enjoy the stars in the night sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than Westerners.
 Suits are the standard of business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by first name or title.
 Teamwork in the workplace is so important that it emphasizes the collective effort over individual performance.
 Workers must get their boss's approval for any decision they make and must follow their boss's instructions without question.
